src/fst/morphology/ext-github_kristiank/data/giellatekno/gt-norm-yamls/N-luikko_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - luikko :   # should decline like the paradigm 'asLuikko'
    luikko+N+Sg+Nom: luikko
    luikko+N+Pl+Nom: luikod
    luikko+N+Sg+Gen: luiko
    luikko+N+Pl+Gen: [luikkoi, luikkojõ]
    luikko+N+Sg+Par: luikkoa
    luikko+N+Pl+Par: luikkoitõ
    luikko+N+Sg+Ill: luikkosõ
    luikko+N+Pl+Ill: luikkoisõ
    luikko+N+Sg+Ine: luikoz
    luikko+N+Pl+Ine: luikkoiz
    luikko+N+Sg+Ela: luikossõ
    luikko+N+Pl+Ela: luikkoissõ
    luikko+N+Sg+All: luikollõ
    luikko+N+Pl+All: luikkoillõ
    luikko+N+Sg+Ade: luikol
    luikko+N+Pl+Ade: luikkoil
    luikko+N+Sg+Abl: luikoltõ
    luikko+N+Pl+Abl: luikkoiltõ
    luikko+N+Sg+Tra: luikossi
    luikko+N+Pl+Tra: luikkoissi
    luikko+N+Sg+Ter: luikkassaa
    luikko+N+Pl+Ter: luikkoissaa
    luikko+N+Sg+Com: luikoka
    luikko+N+Pl+Com: luikkoika
